ro-RO: Mărime din Regatul Unit pentru încălțăminte de bărbați: 10; 10 Foarte lat; 10 Mediu; 10 Îngust; 10 Standard; 10 Lat; 10,5; 10,5 Foarte lat; 10,5 Mediu; 10,5 Îngust; 10,5 Standard; 10,5 Lat; 11; 11 Foarte lat; 11 Mediu; 11 Îngust; 11 Standard; 11 Lat; 11,5; 11,5 Foarte lat; 11,5 Mediu; 11,5 Îngust; 11,5 Standard; 11,5 Lat; 12; 12 Foarte lat; 12 Mediu; 12 Îngust; 12 Standard; 12 Lat; 12,5; 12,5 Foarte lat; 12,5 Mediu; 12,5 Îngust; 12,5 Standard; 12,5 Lat; 13; 13 Foarte lat; 13 Mediu; 13 Îngust; 13 Standard; 13 Lat; 13,5; 13,5 Foarte lat; 13,5 Mediu; 13,5 Îngust; 13,5 Standard; 13,5 Lat; 14; 14 Foarte lat; 14 Mediu; 14 Îngust; 14 Standard; 14 Lat; 14,5; 14,5 Foarte lat; 14,5 Mediu; 14,5 Îngust; 14,5 Standard; 14,5 Lat; 15; 15 Foarte lat; 15 Mediu; 15 Îngust; 15 Standard; 15 Lat; 15,5; 15,5 Foarte lat; 15,5 Mediu; 15,5 Îngust; 15,5 Standard; 15,5 Lat; 16; 16 Foarte lat; 16 Mediu; 16 Îngust; 16 Standard; 16 Lat; 5; 5 Foarte lat; 5 Mediu; 5 Îngust; 5 Standard; 5 Lat; 5,5; 5,5 Foarte lat; 5,5 Mediu; 5,5 Îngust; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Lat; 6; 6 Foarte lat; 6 Mediu; 6 Îngust; 6 Standard; 6 Lat; 6,5; 6,5 Foarte lat; 6,5 Mediu; 6,5 Îngust; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Lat; 7; 7 Extra lat; 7 Mediu; 7 Îngust; 7 Standard; 7 Lat; 7,5; 7,5 Foarte lat; 7,5 Mediu; 7,5 Îngust; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Lat; 8; 8 Extra lat; 8 Mediu; 8 Îngust; 8 Standard; 8 Lat; 8,5; 8,5 Extra lat; 8,5 Mediu; 8,5 Îngust; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Lat; 9; 9 Extra lat; 9 Mediu; 9 Îngust; 9 Standard; 9 Lat; 9,5; 9,5 Extra lat; 9,5 Mediu; 9,5 Îngust; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Lat; Altele
de: Britische Herrenschuhgröße: 10; 10 Extra weit; 10 Mittel; 10 Schmal; 10 Standard; 10 Weit; 10,5; 10,5 Extra weit; 10,5 Mittel; 10,5 Schmal; 10,5 Standard; 10,5 Weit; 11; 11 Extra weit; 11 Mittel; 11 Schmal; 11 Standard; 11 Weit; 11,5; 11,5 Extra weit; 11,5 Mittel; 11,5 Schmal; 11,5 Standard; 11,5 Weit; 12; 12 Extra weit; 12 Mittel; 12 Schmal; 12 Standard; 12 Weit; 12,5; 12,5 Extra weit; 12,5 Mittel; 12,5 Schmal; 12,5 Standard; 12,5 Weit; 13; 13 Extra weit; 13 Mittel; 13 Schmal; 13 Standard; 13 Weit; 13,5; 13,5 Extra weit; 13,5 Mittel; 13,5 Schmal; 13,5 Standard; 13,5 Weit; 14; 14 Extraweit; 14 Mittel; 14 Schmal; 14 Standard; 14 Weit; 14,5; 14,5 Extra weit; 14,5 Mittel; 14,5 Schmal; 14,5 Standard; 14,5 Weit; 15; 15 Extraweit; 15 Mittel; 15 Schmal; 15 Standard; 15 Weit; 15,5; 15,5 Extraweit; 15,5 Mittel; 15,5 Schmal; 15,5 Standard; 15,5 Weit; 16; 16 Extraweit; 16 Mittel; 16 Schmal; 16 Standard; 16 Weit; 5; 5 Extraweit; 5 Mittel; 5 Schmal; 5 Standard; 5 Weit; 5,5; 5,5 Extraweit; 5,5 Mittel; 5,5 Schmal; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Weit; 6; 6 Extraweit; 6 Mittel; 6 Schmal; 6 Standard; 6 Weit; 6,5; 6,5 Extraweit; 6,5 Mittel; 6,5 Schmal; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Weit; 7; 7 Extraweit; 7 Mittel; 7 Schmal; 7 Standard; 7 Weit; 7,5; 7,5 Extraweit; 7,5 Mittel; 7,5 Schmal; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Weit; 8; 8 Extraweit; 8 Mittel; 8 Schmal; 8 Standard; 8 Weit; 8,5; 8,5 Extraweit; 8,5 Mittel; 8,5 Schmal; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Weit; 9; 9 Extraweit; 9 Mittel; 9 Schmal; 9 Standard; 9 Weit; 9,5; 9,5 Extraweit; 9,5 Mittel; 9,5 Schmal; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Weit; Andere
tr: Birleşik Krallık erkek ayakkabı numarası: 10; 10 Ekstra Geniş; 10 Orta; 10 Dar; 10 Standart; 10 Geniş; 10,5; 10,5 Ekstra Geniş; 10,5 Orta; 10,5 Dar; 10,5 Standart; 10,5 Geniş; 11; 11 Ekstra Geniş; 11 Orta; 11 Dar; 11 Standart; 11 Geniş; 11,5; 11,5 Ekstra Geniş; 11,5 Orta; 11,5 Dar; 11,5 Standart; 11,5 Geniş; 12; 12 Ekstra Geniş; 12 Orta; 12 Dar; 12 Standart; 12 Geniş; 12,5; 12,5 Ekstra Geniş; 12,5 Orta; 12,5 Dar; 12,5 Standart; 12,5 Geniş; 13; 13 Ekstra Geniş; 13 Orta; 13 Dar; 13 Standart; 13 Geniş; 13,5; 13,5 Ekstra Geniş; 13,5 Orta; 13,5 Dar; 13,5 Standart; 13,5 Geniş; 14; 14 ekstra geniş; 14 orta; 14 dar; 14 standart; 14 geniş; 14,5; 14,5 Ekstra Geniş; 14,5 Orta; 14,5 Dar; 14,5 Standart; 14,5 Geniş; 15; 15 ekstra geniş; 15 orta; 15 dar; 15 standart; 15 geniş; 15,5; 15,5 ekstra geniş; 15,5 orta; 15,5 dar; 15,5 standart; 15,5 geniş; 16; 16 ekstra geniş; 16 orta; 16 dar; 16 standart; 16 geniş; 5; 5 ekstra geniş; 5 orta; 5 dar; 5 standart; 5 geniş; 5,5; 5,5 ekstra geniş; 5,5 orta; 5,5 dar; 5,5 standart; 5,5 geniş; 6; 6 ekstra geniş; 6 orta; 6 dar; 6 standart; 6 geniş; 6,5; 6,5 ekstra geniş; 6,5 orta; 6,5 dar; 6,5 standart; 6,5 geniş; 7; 7 ekstra geniş; 7 orta; 7 dar; 7 standart; 7 geniş; 7,5; 7,5 ekstra geniş; 7,5 orta; 7,5 dar; 7,5 standart; 7,5 geniş; 8; 8 ekstra geniş; 8 orta; 8 dar; 8 standart; 8 geniş; 8,5; 8,5 ekstra geniş; 8,5 orta; 8,5 dar; 8,5 standart; 8,5 geniş; 9; 9 ekstra geniş; 9 orta; 9 dar; 9 standart; 9 geniş; 9,5; 9,5 ekstra geniş; 9,5 orta; 9,5 dar; 9,5 standart; 9,5 geniş; Diğer
fi: Iso-Britannian miesten kenkäkoko: 10; 10 erikoisleveä; 10 medium; 10 kapea; 10 vakio; 10 leveä; 10,5; 10,5 erikoisleveä; 10,5 medium; 10,5 kapea; 10,5 vakio; 10,5 leveä; 11; 11 erikoisleveä; 11 medium; 11 kapea; 11 vakio; 11 leveä; 11,5; 11,5 erikoisleveä; 11,5 medium; 11,5 kapea; 11,5 vakio; 11,5 leveä; 12; 12 erikoisleveä; 12 medium; 12 kapea; 12 vakio; 12 leveä; 12,5; 12,5 erikoisleveä; 12,5 medium; 12,5 kapea; 12,5 vakio; 12,5 leveä; 13; 13 erikoisleveä; 13 medium; 13 kapea; 13 vakio; 13 leveä; 13,5; 13,5 erikoisleveä; 13,5 medium; 13,5 kapea; 13,5 vakio; 13,5 leveä; 14; 14 erittäin leveä; 14 normaali; 14 kapea; 14 vakio; 14 leveä; 14,5; 14,5 erikoisleveä; 14,5 medium; 14,5 kapea; 14,5 vakio; 14,5 leveä; 15; 15 erittäin leveä; 15 normaali; 15 kapea; 15 vakio; 15 leveä; 15,5; 15,5 erittäin leveä; 15,5 normaali; 15,5 kapea; 15,5 vakio; 15,5 leveä; 16; 16 erittäin leveä; 16 normaali; 16 kapea; 16 vakio; 16 leveä; 5; 5 erittäin leveä; 5 normaali; 5 kapea; 5 vakio; 5 leveä; 5,5; 5,5 erittäin leveä; 5,5 normaali; 5,5 kapea; 5,5 vakio; 5,5 leveä; 6; 6 erittäin leveä; 6 normaali; 6 kapea; 6 vakio; 6 leveä; 6,5; 6,5 erittäin leveä; 6,5 normaali; 6,5 kapea; 6,5 vakio; 6,5 leveä; 7; 7 erittäin leveä; 7 normaali; 7 kapea; 7 vakio; 7 leveä; 7,5; 7,5 erittäin leveä; 7,5 normaali; 7,5 kapea; 7,5 vakio; 7,5 leveä; 8; 8 erittäin leveä; 8 normaali; 8 kapea; 8 vakio; 8 leveä; 8,5; 8,5 erittäin leveä; 8,5 normaali; 8,5 kapea; 8,5 vakio; 8,5 leveä; 9; 9 erittäin leveä; 9 normaali; 9 kapea; 9 vakio; 9 leveä; 9,5; 9,5 erittäin leveä; 9,5 normaali; 9,5 kapea; 9,5 vakio; 9,5 leveä; Muu
zh-CN: 英国男士鞋码: 10; 10 特宽; 10 中; 10 窄; 10 标准; 10 宽; 10.5; 10.5 特宽; 10.5 中; 10.5 窄; 10.5 标准; 10.5 宽; 11; 11 特宽; 11 中; 11 窄; 11 标准; 11 宽; 11.5; 11.5 特宽; 11.5 中; 11.5 窄; 11.5 标准; 11.5 宽; 12; 12 特宽; 12 中; 12 窄; 12 标准; 12 宽; 12.5; 12.5 特宽; 12.5 中; 12.5 窄; 12.5 标准; 12.5 宽; 13; 13 特宽; 13 中; 13 窄; 13 标准; 13 宽; 13.5; 13.5 特宽; 13.5 中; 13.5 窄; 13.5 标准; 13.5 宽; 14; 14 特宽; 14 中等; 14 窄; 14 标准; 14 宽; 14.5; 14.5 特宽; 14.5 中; 14.5 窄; 14.5 标准; 14.5 宽; 15; 15 特宽; 15 中等; 15 窄; 15 标准; 15 宽; 15.5; 15.5 特宽; 15.5 中等; 15.5 窄; 15.5 标准; 15.5 宽; 16; 16 特宽; 16 中等; 16 窄; 16 标准; 16 宽; 5; 5 特宽; 5 中等; 5 窄; 5 标准; 5 宽; 5.5; 5.5 特宽; 5.5 中等; 5.5 窄; 5.5 标准; 5.5 宽; 6; 6 特宽; 6 中等; 6 窄; 6 标准; 6 宽; 6.5; 6.5 特宽; 6.5 中等; 6.5 窄; 6.5 标准; 6.5 宽; 7; 7 特宽; 7 中等; 7 窄; 7 标准; 7 宽; 7.5; 7.5 特宽; 7.5 中等; 7.5 窄; 7.5 标准; 7.5 宽; 8; 8 特宽; 8 中等; 8 窄; 8 标准; 8 宽; 8.5; 8.5 特宽; 8.5 中等; 8.5 窄; 8.5 标准; 8.5 宽; 9; 9 特宽; 9 中等; 9 窄; 9 标准; 9 宽; 9.5; 9.5 特宽; 9.5 中等; 9.5 窄; 9.5 标准; 9.5 宽; 其他
zh-TW: 英國男鞋尺寸: 10; 10 特寬; 10 中; 10 窄; 10 標準; 10 寬; 10.5; 10.5 特寬; 10.5 中; 10.5 窄; 10.5 標準; 10.5 寬; 11; 11 特寬; 11 中; 11 窄; 11 標準; 11 寬; 11.5; 11.5 特寬; 11.5 中; 11.5 窄; 11.5 標準; 11.5 寬; 12; 12 特寬; 12 中; 12 窄; 12 標準; 12 寬; 12.5; 12.5 特寬; 12.5 中; 12.5 窄; 12.5 標準; 12.5 寬; 13; 13 特寬; 13 中; 13 窄; 13 標準; 13 寬; 13.5; 13.5 特寬; 13.5 中; 13.5 窄; 13.5 標準; 13.5 寬; 14; 14 特寬版; 14 中等; 14 窄版; 14 標準; 14 寬版; 14.5; 14.5 特寬; 14.5 中; 14.5 窄; 14.5 標準; 14.5 寬; 15; 15 特寬版; 15 中等; 15 窄版; 15 標準; 15 寬版; 15.5; 15.5 特寬版; 15.5 中等; 15.5 窄版; 15.5 標準; 15.5 寬版; 16; 16 特寬版; 16 中等; 16 窄版; 16 標準; 16 寬版; 5; 5 特寬版; 5 中等; 5 窄版; 5 標準; 5 寬版; 5.5; 5.5 特寬版; 5.5 中等; 5.5 窄版; 5.5 標準; 5.5 寬版; 6; 6 特寬版; 6 中等; 6 窄版; 6 標準; 6 寬版; 6.5; 6.5 特寬版; 6.5 中等; 6.5 窄版; 6.5 標準; 6.5 寬版; 7; 7 特寬版; 7 中等; 7 窄版; 7 標準; 7 寬版; 7.5; 7.5 特寬版; 7.5 中等; 7.5 窄版; 7.5 標準; 7.5 寬版; 8; 8 特寬版; 8 中等; 8 窄版; 8 標準; 8 寬版; 8.5; 8.5 特寬版; 8.5 中等; 8.5 窄版; 8.5 標準; 8.5 寬版; 9; 9 特寬版; 9 中等; 9 窄版; 9 標準; 9 寬版; 9.5; 9.5 特寬版; 9.5 中等; 9.5 窄版; 9.5 標準; 9.5 寬版; 其他
sk-SK: Veľkosť pánskej obuvi v Spojenom kráľovstve: 10; 10 extra široká; 10 stredná; 10 úzka; 10 štandardná; 10 široká; 10,5; 10,5 extra široká; 10,5 stredná; 10,5 úzka; 10,5 štandardná; 10,5 široká; 11; 11 extra široká; 11 stredná; 11 úzka; 11 štandardná; 11 široká; 11,5; 11,5 extra široká; 11,5 stredná; 11,5 úzka; 11,5 štandardná; 11,5 široká; 12; 12 extra široká; 12 stredná; 12 úzka; 12 štandardná; 12 široká; 12,5; 12,5 extra široká; 12,5 stredná; 12,5 úzka; 12,5 štandardná; 12,5 široká; 13; 13 extra široká; 13 stredná; 13 úzka; 13 štandardná; 13 široká; 13,5; 13,5 extra široká; 13,5 stredná; 13,5 úzka; 13,5 štandardná; 13,5 široká; 14; 14 extra široká; 14 stredná; 14 úzka; 14 štandardná; 14 široká; 14,5; 14,5 extra široká; 14,5 stredná; 14,5 úzka; 14,5 štandardná; 14,5 široká; 15; 15 extra široká; 15 stredná; 15 úzka; 15 štandardná; 15 široká; 15,5; 15,5 extra široká; 15,5 stredná; 15,5 úzka; 15,5 štandardná; 15,5 široká; 16; 16 extra široká; 16 stredná; 16 úzka; 16 štandardná; 16 široká; 5; 5 extra široká; 5 stredná; 5 úzka; 5 štandardná; 5 široká; 5,5; 5,5 extra široká; 5,5 stredná; 5,5 úzka; 5,5 štandardná; 5,5 široká; 6; 6 extra široká; 6 stredná; 6 úzka; 6 štandardná; 6 široká; 6,5; 6,5 extra široká; 6,5 stredná; 6,5 úzka; 6,5 štandardná; 6,5 široká; 7; 7 extra široká; 7 stredná; 7 úzka; 7 štandardná; 7 široká; 7,5; 7,5 extra široká; 7,5 stredná; 7,5 úzka; 7,5 štandardná; 7,5 široká; 8; 8 extra široká; 8 stredná; 8 úzka; 8 štandardná; 8 široká; 8,5; 8,5 extra široká; 8,5 stredná; 8,5 úzka; 8,5 štandardná; 8,5 široká; 9; 9 extra široká; 9 stredná; 9 úzka; 9 štandardná; 9 široká; 9,5; 9,5 extra široká; 9,5 stredná; 9,5 úzka; 9,5 štandardná; 9,5 široká; Iné
it: Numero di scarpa da uomo UK: 10; 10 Extra largo; 10 Medio; 10 Stretto; 10 Standard; 10 Largo; 10,5; 10,5 Extra largo; 10,5 Medio; 10,5 Stretto; 10,5 Standard; 10,5 Largo; 11; 11 Extra largo; 11 Medio; 11 Stretto; 11 Standard; 11 Largo; 11,5; 11,5 Extra largo; 11,5 Medio; 11,5 Stretto; 11,5 Standard; 11,5 Largo; 12; 12 Extra largo; 12 Medio; 12 Stretto; 12 Standard; 12 Largo; 12,5; 12,5 Extra largo; 12,5 Medio; 12,5 Stretto; 12,5 Standard; 12,5 Largo; 13; 13 Extra largo; 13 Medio; 13 Stretto; 13 Standard; 13 Largo; 13,5; 13,5 Extra largo; 13,5 Medio; 13,5 Stretto; 13,5 Standard; 13,5 Largo; 14; 14 extra largo; 14 medio; 14 stretto; 14 standard; 14 largo; 14,5; 14,5 Extra largo; 14,5 Medio; 14,5 Stretto; 14,5 Standard; 14,5 Largo; 15; 15 extra largo; 15 medio; 15 stretto; 15 standard; 15 largo; 15,5; 15,5 extra largo; 15,5 medio; 15,5 stretto; 15,5 standard; 15,5 largo; 16; 16 extra largo; 16 medio; 16 stretto; 16 standard; 16 largo; 5; 5 extra largo; 5 medio; 5 stretto; 5 standard; 5 largo; 5,5; 5,5 extra largo; 5,5 medio; 5,5 stretto; 5,5 standard; 5,5 largo; 6; 6 extra largo; 6 medio; 6 stretto; 6 standard; 6 largo; 6,5; 6,5 extra largo; 6,5 medio; 6,5 stretto; 6,5 standard; 6,5 largo; 7; 7 extra largo; 7 medio; 7 stretto; 7 standard; 7 largo; 7,5; 7,5 extra largo; 7,5 medio; 7,5 stretto; 7,5 standard; 7,5 largo; 8; 8 extra largo; 8 medio; 8 stretto; 8 standard; 8 largo; 8,5; 8,5 extra largo; 8,5 medio; 8,5 stretto; 8,5 standard; 8,5 largo; 9; 9 extra largo; 9 medio; 9 stretto; 9 standard; 9 largo; 9,5; 9,5 extra largo; 9,5 medio; 9,5 stretto; 9,5 standard; 9,5 largo; Altro
ja: 英国男性用靴の寸法: 10; 10 エクストラワイド; 10 ミディアム; 10 ナロー; 10 スタンダード; 10 ワイド; 10.5; 10.5 エクストラワイド; 10.5 ミディアム; 10.5 ナロー; 10.5 スタンダード; 10.5 ワイド; 11; 11 エクストラワイド; 11 ミディアム; 11 ナロー; 11 スタンダード; 11 ワイド; 11.5; 11.5 エクストラワイド; 11.5 ミディアム; 11.5 ナロー; 11.5 スタンダード; 11.5 ワイド; 12; 12 エクストラワイド; 12 ミディアム; 12 ナロー; 12 スタンダード; 12 ワイド; 12.5; 12.5 エクストラワイド; 12.5 ミディアム; 12.5 ナロー; 12.5 スタンダード; 12.5 ワイド; 13; 13 エクストラワイド; 13 ミディアム; 13 ナロー; 13 スタンダード; 13 ワイド; 13.5; 13.5 エクストラワイド; 13.5 ミディアム; 13.5 ナロー; 13.5 スタンダード; 13.5 ワイド; 14; 14 エクストラワイド; 14 ミディアム; 14 ナロー; 14 スタンダード; 14 ワイド; 14.5; 14.5 エクストラワイド; 14.5 ミディアム; 14.5 ナロー; 14.5 スタンダード; 14.5 ワイド; 15; 15 エクストラワイド; 15 ミディアム; 15 ナロー; 15 スタンダード; 15 ワイド; 15.5; 15.5 エクストラワイド; 15.5 ミディアム; 15.5 ナロー; 15.5 スタンダード; 15.5 ワイド; 16; 16 エクストラワイド; 16 ミディアム; 16 ナロー; 16 スタンダード; 16 ワイド; 5; 5 エクストラワイド; 5 ミディアム; 5 ナロー; 5 スタンダード; 5 ワイド; 5.5; 5.5 エクストラワイド; 5.5 ミディアム; 5.5 ナロー; 5.5 スタンダード; 5.5 ワイド; 6; 6 エクストラワイド; 6 ミディアム; 6 ナロー; 6 スタンダード; 6 ワイド; 6.5; 6.5 エクストラワイド; 6.5 ミディアム; 6.5 ナロー; 6.5 スタンダード; 6.5 ワイド; 7; 7 エクストラワイド; 7 ミディアム; 7 ナロー; 7 スタンダード; 7 ワイド; 7.5; 7.5 エクストラワイド; 7.5 ミディアム; 7.5 ナロー; 7.5 スタンダード; 7.5 ワイド; 8; 8 エクストラワイド; 8 ミディアム; 8 ナロー; 8 スタンダード; 8 ワイド; 8.5; 8.5 エクストラワイド; 8.5 ミディアム; 8.5 ナロー; 8.5 スタンダード; 8.5 ワイド; 9; 9 エクストラワイド; 9 ミディアム; 9 ナロー; 9 スタンダード; 9 ワイド; 9.5; 9.5 エクストラワイド; 9.5 ミディアム; 9.5 ナロー; 9.5 スタンダード; 9.5 ワイド; その他
fr: Pointure UK pour femme: 10; 10 très large; 10 moyen; 10 étroit; 10 standard; 10 large; 10,5; 10,5 très large; 10,5 moyen; 10,5 étroit; 10,5 standard; 10,5 large; 11; 11 très large; 11 moyen; 11 étroit; 11 standard; 11 large; 11,5; 11,5 très large; 11,5 moyen; 11,5 étroit; 11,5 standard; 11,5 large; 12; 12 très large; 12 moyen; 12 étroit; 12 standard; 12 large; 12,5; 12,5 très large; 12,5 moyen; 12,5 étroit; 12,5 standard; 12,5 large; 13; 13 très large; 13 moyen; 13 étroit; 13 standard; 13 large; 13,5; 13,5 très large; 13,5 moyen; 13,5 étroit; 13,5 standard; 13,5 large; 14; 14 Extra large; 14 Moyen; 14 Étroit; 14 Standard; 14 Large; 14,5; 14,5 très large; 14,5 moyen; 14,5 étroit; 14,5 standard; 14,5 large; 15; 15 Extra large; 15 Moyen; 15 Étroit; 15 Standard; 15 Large; 15,5; 15,5 Extra large; 15,5 Moyen; 15,5 Étroit; 15,5 Standard; 15,5 Large; 16; 16 Extra large; 16 Moyen; 16 Étroit; 16 Standard; 16 Large; 5; 5 Extra large; 5 Moyen; 5 Étroit; 5 Standard; 5 Large; 5,5; 5,5 Extra large; 5,5 Moyen; 5,5 Étroit; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Large; 6; 6 Extra large; 6 Moyen; 6 Étroit; 6 Standard; 6 Large; 6,5; 6,5 Extra large; 6,5 Moyen; 6,5 Étroit; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Large; 7; 7 Extra large; 7 Moyen; 7 Étroit; 7 Standard; 7 Large; 7,5; 7,5 Extra large; 7,5 Moyen; 7,5 Étroit; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Large; 8; 8 Extra large; 8 Moyen; 8 Étroit; 8 Standard; 8 Large; 8,5; 8,5 Extra large; 8,5 Moyen; 8,5 Étroit; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Large; 9; 9 Extra large; 9 Moyen; 9 Étroit; 9 Standard; 9 Large; 9,5; 9,5 Extra large; 9,5 Moyen; 9,5 Étroit; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Large; Autre
vi: Cỡ giày nam theo chuẩn Anh (UK): 10; 10 Rất rộng; 10 Trung bình; 10 Hẹp; 10 Tiêu chuẩn; 10 Rộng; 10.5; 10.5 Rất rộng; 10.5 Trung bình; 10.5 Hẹp; 10.5 Tiêu chuẩn; 10.5 Rộng; 11; 11 Rất rộng; 11 Trung bình; 11 Hẹp; 11 Tiêu chuẩn; 11 Rộng; 11.5; 11.5 Rất rộng; 11.5 Trung bình; 11.5 Hẹp; 11.5 Tiêu chuẩn; 11.5 Rộng; 12; 12 Rất rộng; 12 Trung bình; 12 Hẹp; 12 Tiêu chuẩn; 12 Rộng; 12.5; 12.5 Rất rộng; 12.5 Trung bình; 12.5 Hẹp; 12.5 Tiêu chuẩn; 12.5 Rộng; 13; 13 Rất rộng; 13 Trung bình; 13 Hẹp; 13 Tiêu chuẩn; 13 Rộng; 13.5; 13.5 Rất rộng; 13.5 Trung bình; 13.5 Hẹp; 13.5 Tiêu chuẩn; 13.5 Rộng; 14; 14 cực rộng; 14 trung bình; 14 hẹp; 14 tiêu chuẩn; 14 rộng; 14.5; 14.5 Rất rộng; 14.5 Trung bình; 14.5 Hẹp; 14.5 Tiêu chuẩn; 14.5 Rộng; 15; 15 cực rộng; 15 trung bình; 15 hẹp; 15 tiêu chuẩn; 15 rộng; 15.5; 15.5 cực rộng; 15.5 trung bình; 15.5 hẹp; 15.5 tiêu chuẩn; 15.5 rộng; 16; 16 cực rộng; 16 trung bình; 16 hẹp; 16 tiêu chuẩn; 16 rộng; 5; 5 cực rộng; 5 trung bình; 5 hẹp; 5 tiêu chuẩn; 5 rộng; 5.5; 5.5 cực rộng; 5.5 trung bình; 5.5 hẹp; 5.5 tiêu chuẩn; 5.5 rộng; 6; 6 cực rộng; 6 trung bình; 6 hẹp; 6 tiêu chuẩn; 6 rộng; 6.5; 6.5 cực rộng; 6.5 trung bình; 6.5 hẹp; 6.5 tiêu chuẩn; 6.5 rộng; 7; 7 cực rộng; 7 trung bình; 7 hẹp; 7 tiêu chuẩn; 7 rộng; 7.5; 7.5 cực rộng; 7.5 trung bình; 7.5 hẹp; 7.5 tiêu chuẩn; 7.5 rộng; 8; 8 cực rộng; 8 trung bình; 8 hẹp; 8 tiêu chuẩn; 8 rộng; 8.5; 8.5 cực rộng; 8.5 trung bình; 8.5 hẹp; 8.5 tiêu chuẩn; 8.5 rộng; 9; 9 cực rộng; 9 trung bình; 9 hẹp; 9 tiêu chuẩn; 9 rộng; 9.5; 9.5 cực rộng; 9.5 trung bình; 9.5 hẹp; 9.5 tiêu chuẩn; 9.5 rộng; Khác
pl: Rozmiar buta męskiego UK: 10; 10 bardzo szerokie; 10 średnie; 10 wąskie; 10 standardowe; 10 szerokie; 10,5; 10,5 bardzo szerokie; 10,5 średnie; 10,5 wąskie; 10,5 standardowe; 10,5 szerokie; 11; 11 bardzo szerokie; 11 średnie; 11 wąskie; 11 standardowe; 11 szerokie; 11,5; 11,5 bardzo szerokie; 11,5 średnie; 11,5 wąskie; 11,5 standardowe; 11,5 szerokie; 12; 12 bardzo szerokie; 12 średnie; 12 wąskie; 12 standardowe; 12 szerokie; 12,5; 12,5 bardzo szerokie; 12,5 średnie; 12,5 wąskie; 12,5 standardowe; 12,5 szerokie; 13; 13 bardzo szerokie; 13 średnie; 13 wąskie; 13 standardowe; 13 szerokie; 13,5; 13,5 bardzo szerokie; 13,5 średnie; 13,5 wąskie; 13,5 standardowe; 13,5 szerokie; 14; 14 bardzo szerokie; 14 średnie; 14 wąskie; 14 standardowe; 14 szerokie; 14,5; 14,5 bardzo szerokie; 14,5 średnie; 14,5 wąskie; 14,5 standardowe; 14,5 szerokie; 15; 15 bardzo szerokie; 15 średnie; 15 wąskie; 15 standardowe; 15 szerokie; 15,5; 15,5 bardzo szerokie; 15,5 średnie; 15,5 wąskie; 15,5 standardowe; 15,5 szerokie; 16; 16 bardzo szerokie; 16 średnie; 16 wąskie; 16 standardowe; 16 szerokie; 5; 5 bardzo szerokie; 5 średnie; 5 wąskie; 5 standardowe; 5 szerokie; 5,5; 5,5 bardzo szerokie; 5,5 średnie; 5,5 wąskie; 5,5 standardowe; 5,5 szerokie; 6; 6 bardzo szerokie; 6 średnie; 6 wąskie; 6 standardowe; 6 szerokie; 6,5; 6,5 bardzo szerokie; 6,5 średnie; 6,5 wąskie; 6,5 standardowe; 6,5 szerokie; 7; 7 bardzo szerokie; 7 średnie; 7 wąskie; 7 standardowe; 7 szerokie; 7,5; 7,5 bardzo szerokie; 7,5 średnie; 7,5 wąskie; 7,5 standardowe; 7,5 szerokie; 8; 8 bardzo szerokie; 8 średnie; 8 wąskie; 8 standardowe; 8 szerokie; 8,5; 8,5 bardzo szerokie; 8,5 średnie; 8,5 wąskie; 8,5 standardowe; 8,5 szerokie; 9; 9 bardzo szerokie; 9 średnie; 9 wąskie; 9 standardowe; 9 szerokie; 9,5; 9,5 bardzo szerokie; 9,5 średnie; 9,5 wąskie; 9,5 standardowe; 9,5 szerokie; Inne
pt-PT: Tamanho de calçado masculino do Reino Unido: 10; 10 Extralargo; 10 Normal; 10 Estreito; 10 Padrão; 10 Largo; 10,5; 10,5 Extralargo; 10,5 Normal; 10,5 Estreito; 10,5 Padrão; 10,5 Largo; 11; 11 Extralargo; 11 Normal; 11 Estreito; 11 Padrão; 11 Largo; 11,5; 11,5 Extralargo; 11,5 Normal; 11,5 Estreito; 11,5 Padrão; 11,5 Largo; 12; 12 Extralargo; 12 Normal; 12 Estreito; 12 Padrão; 12 Largo; 12,5; 12,5 Extralargo; 12,5 Normal; 12,5 Estreito; 12,5 Padrão; 12,5 Largo; 13; 13 Extralargo; 13 Normal; 13 Estreito; 13 Padrão; 13 Largo; 13,5; 13,5 Extralargo; 13,5 Normal; 13,5 Estreito; 13,5 Padrão; 13,5 Largo; 14; 14 Extra largo; 14 Médio; 14 Estreito; 14 Standard; 14 Largo; 14,5; 14,5 Extralargo; 14,5 Normal; 14,5 Estreito; 14,5 Padrão; 14,5 Largo; 15; 15 Extra largo; 15 Médio; 15 Estreito; 15 Standard; 15 Largo; 15,5; 15,5 Extra largo; 15,5 Médio; 15,5 Estreito; 15,5 Standard; 15,5 Largo; 16; 16 Extra largo; 16 Médio; 16 Estreito; 16 Standard; 16 Largo; 5; 5 Extra largo; 5 Médio; 5 Estreito; 5 Standard; 5 Largo; 5,5; 5,5 Extra largo; 5,5 Médio; 5,5 Estreito; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Largo; 6; 6 Extra largo; 6 Médio; 6 Estreito; 6 Standard; 6 Largo; 6,5; 6,5 Extra largo; 6,5 Médio; 6,5 Estreito; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Largo; 7; 7 Extra largo; 7 Médio; 7 Estreito; 7 Standard; 7 Largo; 7,5; 7,5 Extra largo; 7,5 Médio; 7,5 Estreito; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Largo; 8; 8 Extra largo; 8 Médio; 8 Estreito; 8 Standard; 8 Largo; 8,5; 8,5 Extra largo; 8,5 Médio; 8,5 Estreito; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Largo; 9; 9 Extra largo; 9 Médio; 9 Estreito; 9 Standard; 9 Largo; 9,5; 9,5 Extra largo; 9,5 Médio; 9,5 Estreito; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Largo; Outro
da: Britisk skostørrelse for kvinder: 10; 10 Ekstra bred; 10 Medium; 10 Smal; 10 Standard; 10 Bred; 10,5; 10,5 Ekstra bred; 10,5 Medium; 10,5 Smal; 10,5 Standard; 10,5 Bred; 11; 11 Ekstra bred; 11 Medium; 11 Smal; 11 Standard; 11 Bred; 11,5; 11,5 Ekstra bred; 11,5 Medium; 11,5 Smal; 11,5 Standard; 11,5 Bred; 12; 12 Ekstra bred; 12 Medium; 12 Smal; 12 Standard; 12 Bred; 12,5; 12,5 Ekstra bred; 12,5 Medium; 12,5 Smal; 12,5 Standard; 12,5 Bred; 13; 13 Ekstra bred; 13 Medium; 13 Smal; 13 Standard; 13 Bred; 13,5; 13,5 Ekstra bred; 13,5 Medium; 13,5 Smal; 13,5 Standard; 13,5 Bred; 14; 14 ekstra bred; 14 medium; 14 smal; 14 standard; 14 bred; 14,5; 14,5 Ekstra bred; 14,5 Medium; 14,5 Smal; 14,5 Standard; 14,5 Bred; 15; 15 ekstra bred; 15 medium; 15 smal; 15 standard; 15 bred; 15,5; 15,5 ekstra bred; 15,5 medium; 15,5 smal; 15,5 standard; 15,5 bred; 16; 16 ekstra bred; 16 medium; 16 smal; 16 standard; 16 bred; 5; 5 ekstra bred; 5 medium; 5 smal; 5 standard; 5 bred; 5,5; 5,5 ekstra bred; 5,5 medium; 5,5 smal; 5,5 standard; 5,5 bred; 6; 6 ekstra bred; 6 medium; 6 smal; 6 standard; 6 bred; 6,5; 6,5 ekstra bred; 6,5 medium; 6,5 smal; 6,5 standard; 6,5 bred; 7; 7 ekstra bred; 7 medium; 7 smal; 7 standard; 7 bred; 7,5; 7,5 ekstra bred; 7,5 medium; 7,5 smal; 7,5 standard; 7,5 bred; 8; 8 ekstra bred; 8 medium; 8 smal; 8 standard; 8 bred; 8,5; 8,5 ekstra bred; 8,5 medium; 8,5 smal; 8,5 standard; 8,5 bred; 9; 9 ekstra bred; 9 medium; 9 smal; 9 standard; 9 bred; 9,5; 9,5 ekstra bred; 9,5 medium; 9,5 smal; 9,5 standard; 9,5 bred; Andet
bg-BG: UK размер на мъжки обувки: 10; 10 много широк; 10 среден; 10 тесен; 10 стандартен; 10 широк; 10,5; 10,5 много широк; 10,5 среден; 10,5 тесен; 10,5 стандартен; 10,5 широк; 11; 11 много широк; 11 среден; 11 тесен; 11 стандартен; 11 широк; 11,5; 11,5 много широк; 11,5 среден; 11,5 тесен; 11,5 стандартен; 11,5 широк; 12; 12 много широк; 12 среден; 12 тесен; 12 стандартен; 12 широк; 12,5; 12,5 много широк; 12,5 среден; 12,5 тесен; 12,5 стандартен; 12,5 широк; 13; 13 много широк; 13 среден; 13 тесен; 13 стандартен; 13 широк; 13,5; 13,5 много широк; 13,5 среден; 13,5 тесен; 13,5 стандартен; 13,5 широк; 14; 14 много широк; 14 среден; 14 тесен; 14 стандартен; 14 широк; 14,5; 14,5 много широк; 14,5 среден; 14,5 тесен; 14,5 стандартен; 14,5 широк; 15; 15 много широк; 15 среден; 15 тесен; 15 стандартен; 15 широк; 15,5; 15,5 много широк; 15,5 среден; 15,5 тесен; 15,5 стандартен; 15,5 широк; 16; 16 много широк; 16 среден; 16 тесен; 16 стандартен; 16 широк; 5; 5 много широк; 5 среден; 5 тесен; 5 стандартен; 5 широк; 5,5; 5,5 много широк; 5,5 среден; 5,5 тесен; 5,5 стандартен; 5,5 широк; 6; 6 много широк; 6 среден; 6 тесен; 6 стандартен; 6 широк; 6,5; 6,5 много широк; 6,5 среден; 6,5 тесен; 6,5 стандартен; 6,5 широк; 7; 7 много широк; 7 среден; 7 тесен; 7 стандартен; 7 широк; 7,5; 7,5 много широк; 7,5 среден; 7,5 тесен; 7,5 стандартен; 7,5 широк; 8; 8 много широк; 8 среден; 8 тесен; 8 стандартен; 8 широк; 8,5; 8,5 много широк; 8,5 среден; 8,5 тесен; 8,5 стандартен; 8,5 широк; 9; 9 много широк; 9 среден; 9 тесен; 9 стандартен; 9 широк; 9,5; 9,5 много широк; 9,5 среден; 9,5 тесен; 9,5 стандартен; 9,5 широк; Друг
es: Número de zapato de hombre del Reino Unido: 10; 10 extra ancho; 10 medio; 10 estrecho; 10 estándar; 10 ancho; 10,5; 10,5 extra ancho; 10,5 medio; 10,5 estrecho; 10,5 estándar; 10,5 ancho; 11; 11 extra ancho; 11 medio; 11 estrecho; 11 estándar; 11 ancho; 11,5; 11,5 extra ancho; 11,5 medio; 11,5 estrecho; 11,5 estándar; 11,5 ancho; 12; 12 extra ancho; 12 medio; 12 estrecho; 12 estándar; 12 ancho; 12,5; 12,5 extra ancho; 12,5 medio; 12,5 estrecho; 12,5 estándar; 12,5 ancho; 13; 13 extra ancho; 13 medio; 13 estrecho; 13 estándar; 13 ancho; 13,5; 13,5 extra ancho; 13,5 medio; 13,5 estrecho; 13,5 estándar; 13,5 ancho; 14; 14 extra ancho; 14 mediano; 14 estrecho; 14 estándar; 14 ancho; 14,5; 14,5 extra ancho; 14,5 medio; 14,5 estrecho; 14,5 estándar; 14,5 ancho; 15; 15 extra ancho; 15 mediano; 15 estrecho; 15 estándar; 15 ancho; 15,5; 15,5 extra ancho; 15,5 mediano; 15,5 estrecho; 15,5 estándar; 15,5 ancho; 16; 16 extra ancho; 16 mediano; 16 estrecho; 16 estándar; 16 ancho; 5; 5 extra ancho; 5 mediano; 5 estrecho; 5 estándar; 5 ancho; 5,5; 5,5 extra ancho; 5,5 mediano; 5,5 estrecho; 5,5 estándar; 5,5 ancho; 6; 6 extra ancho; 6 mediano; 6 estrecho; 6 estándar; 6 ancho; 6,5; 6,5 extra ancho; 6,5 mediano; 6,5 estrecho; 6,5 estándar; 6,5 ancho; 7; 7 extra ancho; 7 mediano; 7 estrecho; 7 estándar; 7 ancho; 7,5; 7,5 extra ancho; 7,5 mediano; 7,5 estrecho; 7,5 estándar; 7,5 ancho; 8; 8 extra ancho; 8 mediano; 8 estrecho; 8 estándar; 8 ancho; 8,5; 8,5 extra ancho; 8,5 mediano; 8,5 estrecho; 8,5 estándar; 8,5 ancho; 9; 9 extra ancho; 9 mediano; 9 estrecho; 9 estándar; 9 ancho; 9,5; 9,5 extra ancho; 9,5 mediano; 9,5 estrecho; 9,5 estándar; 9,5 ancho; Otro
el: Βρετανικό μέγεθος ανδρικών παπουτσιών: 10; 10 Πολύ φαρδύ; 10 Κανονικό; 10 Στενό; 10 Κανονικό; 10 Φαρδύ; 10,5; 10,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 10,5 Κανονικό; 10,5 Στενό; 10,5 Κανονικό; 10,5 Φαρδύ; 11; 11 Πολύ φαρδύ; 11 Κανονικό; 11 Στενό; 11 Κανονικό; 11 Φαρδύ; 11,5; 11,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 11,5 Κανονικό; 11,5 Στενό; 11,5 Κανονικό; 11,5 Φαρδύ; 12; 12 Πολύ φαρδύ; 12 Κανονικό; 12 Στενό; 12 Κανονικό; 12 Φαρδύ; 12,5; 12,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 12,5 Κανονικό; 12,5 Στενό; 12,5 Κανονικό; 12,5 Φαρδύ; 13; 13 Πολύ φαρδύ; 13 Κανονικό; 13 Στενό; 13 Κανονικό; 13 Φαρδύ; 13,5; 13,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 13,5 Κανονικό; 13,5 Στενό; 13,5 Κανονικό; 13,5 Φαρδύ; 14; 14 Πολύ φαρδύ; 14 Μεσαίο; 14 Στενό; 14 Κανονικό; 14 Φαρδύ; 14,5; 14,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 14,5 Κανονικό; 14,5 Στενό; 14,5 Κανονικό; 14,5 Φαρδύ; 15; 15 Πολύ φαρδύ; 15 Μεσαίο; 15 Στενό; 15 Κανονικό; 15 Φαρδύ; 15,5; 15,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 15,5 Μεσαίο; 15,5 Στενό; 15,5 Κανονικό; 15,5 Φαρδύ; 16; 16 Πολύ φαρδύ; 16 Μεσαίο; 16 Στενό; 16 Κανονικό; 16 Φαρδύ; 5; 5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 5 Μεσαίο; 5 Στενό; 5 Κανονικό; 5 Φαρδύ; 5,5; 5,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 5,5 Μεσαίο; 5,5 Στενό; 5,5 Κανονικό; 5,5 Φαρδύ; 6; 6 Πολύ φαρδύ; 6 Μεσαίο; 6 Στενό; 6 Κανονικό; 6 Φαρδύ; 6,5; 6,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 6,5 Μεσαίο; 6,5 Στενό; 6,5 Κανονικό; 6,5 Φαρδύ; 7; 7 Πολύ φαρδύ; 7 Μεσαίο; 7 Στενό; 7 Κανονικό; 7 Φαρδύ; 7,5; 7,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 7,5 Μεσαίο; 7,5 Στενό; 7,5 Κανονικό; 7,5 Φαρδύ; 8; 8 Πολύ φαρδύ; 8 Μεσαίο; 8 Στενό; 8 Κανονικό; 8 Φαρδύ; 8,5; 8,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 8,5 Μεσαίο; 8,5 Στενό; 8,5 Κανονικό; 8,5 Φαρδύ; 9; 9 Πολύ φαρδύ; 9 Μεσαίο; 9 Στενό; 9 Κανονικό; 9 Φαρδύ; 9,5; 9,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 9,5 Μεσαίο; 9,5 Στενό; 9,5 Κανονικό; 9,5 Φαρδύ; Άλλο
hr-HR: Veličina muške obuće (SAD): 10; 10 ekstra široko; 10 srednje; 10 usko; 10 standardno; 10 široko; 10,5; 10,5 ekstra široko; 10,5 srednje; 10,5 usko; 10,5 standardno; 10,5 široko; 11; 11 ekstra široko; 11 srednje; 11 usko; 11 standardno; 11 široko; 11,5; 11,5 ekstra široko; 11,5 srednje; 11,5 usko; 11,5 standardno; 11,5 široko; 12; 12 ekstra široko; 12 srednje; 12 usko; 12 standardno; 12 široko; 12,5; 12,5 ekstra široko; 12,5 srednje; 12,5 usko; 12,5 standardno; 12,5 široko; 13; 13 ekstra široko; 13 srednje; 13 usko; 13 standardno; 13 široko; 13,5; 13,5 ekstra široko; 13,5 srednje; 13,5 usko; 13,5 standardno; 13,5 široko; 14; 14 ekstra široko; 14 srednje; 14 usko; 14 standardno; 14 široko; 14,5; 14,5 ekstra široko; 14,5 srednje; 14,5 usko; 14,5 standardno; 14,5 široko; 15; 15 ekstra široko; 15 srednje; 15 usko; 15 standardno; 15 široko; 15,5; 15,5 ekstra široko; 15,5 srednje; 15,5 usko; 15,5 standardno; 15,5 široko; 16; 16 ekstra široko; 16 srednje; 16 usko; 16 standardno; 16 široko; 5; 5 ekstra široko; 5 srednje; 5 usko; 5 standardno; 5 široko; 5,5; 5,5 ekstra široko; 5,5 srednje; 5,5 usko; 5,5 standardno; 5,5 široko; 6; 6 ekstra široko; 6 srednje; 6 usko; 6 standardno; 6 široko; 6,5; 6,5 ekstra široko; 6,5 srednje; 6,5 usko; 6,5 standardno; 6,5 široko; 7; 7 iznimno široko; 7 srednje; 7 usko; 7 standardno; 7 široko; 7,5; 7,5 ekstra široko; 7,5 srednje; 7,5 usko; 7,5 standardno; 7,5 široko; 8; 8 iznimno široko; 8 srednje; 8 usko; 8 standardno; 8 široko; 8,5; 8,5 iznimno široko; 8,5 srednje; 8,5 usko; 8,5 standardno; 8,5 široko; 9; 9 iznimno široko; 9 srednje; 9 usko; 9 standardno; 9 široko; 9,5; 9,5 iznimno široko; 9,5 srednje; 9,5 usko; 9,5 standardno; 9,5 široko; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tamanho do sapato masculino no Reino Unido: 10; 10 Extra largo; 10 Médio; 10 Estreito; 10 Padrão; 10 Largo; 10,5; 10,5 Extra largo; 10,5 Médio; 10,5 Estreito; 10,5 Padrão; 10,5 Largo; 11; 11 Extra largo; 11 Médio; 11 Estreito; 11 Padrão; 11 Largo; 11,5; 11,5 Extra largo; 11,5 Médio; 11,5 Estreito; 11,5 Padrão; 11,5 Largo; 12; 12 Extra largo; 12 Médio; 12 Estreito; 12 Padrão; 12 Largo; 12,5; 12,5 Extra largo; 12,5 Médio; 12,5 Estreito; 12,5 Padrão; 12,5 Largo; 13; 13 Extra largo; 13 Médio; 13 Estreito; 13 Padrão; 13 Largo; 13,5; 13,5 Extra largo; 13,5 Médio; 13,5 Estreito; 13,5 Padrão; 13,5 Largo; 14; 14 Extralargo; 14 Médio; 14 Estreito; 14 Padrão; 14 Largo; 14,5; 14,5 Extra largo; 14,5 Médio; 14,5 Estreito; 14,5 Padrão; 14,5 Largo; 15; 15 Extralargo; 15 Médio; 15 Estreito; 15 Padrão; 15 Largo; 15,5; 15,5 Extralargo; 15,5 Médio; 15,5 Estreito; 15,5 Padrão; 15,5 Largo; 16; 16 Extralargo; 16 Médio; 16 Estreito; 16 Padrão; 16 Largo; 5; 5 Extralargo; 5 Médio; 5 Estreito; 5 Padrão; 5 Largo; 5,5; 5,5 Extralargo; 5,5 Médio; 5,5 Estreito; 5,5 Padrão; 5,5 Largo; 6; 6 Extralargo; 6 Médio; 6 Estreito; 6 Padrão; 6 Largo; 6,5; 6,5 Extralargo; 6,5 Médio; 6,5 Estreito; 6,5 Padrão; 6,5 Largo; 7; 7 Extralargo; 7 Médio; 7 Estreito; 7 Padrão; 7 Largo; 7,5; 7,5 Extralargo; 7,5 Médio; 7,5 Estreito; 7,5 Padrão; 7,5 Largo; 8; 8 Extralargo; 8 Médio; 8 Estreito; 8 Padrão; 8 Largo; 8,5; 8,5 Extralargo; 8,5 Médio; 8,5 Estreito; 8,5 Padrão; 8,5 Largo; 9; 9 Extralargo; 9 Médio; 9 Estreito; 9 Padrão; 9 Largo; 9,5; 9,5 Extralargo; 9,5 Médio; 9,5 Estreito; 9,5 Padrão; 9,5 Largo; Outro
ko: 영국 남성 신발 사이즈: 10; 10 엑스트라 와이드; 10 미디엄; 10 내로우; 10 스탠다드; 10 와이드; 10.5; 10.5 엑스트라 와이드; 10.5 미디엄; 10.5 내로우; 10.5 스탠다드; 10.5 와이드; 11; 11 엑스트라 와이드; 11 미디엄; 11 내로우; 11 스탠다드; 11 와이드; 11.5; 11.5 엑스트라 와이드; 11.5 미디엄; 11.5 내로우; 11.5 스탠다드; 11.5 와이드; 12; 12 엑스트라 와이드; 12 미디엄; 12 내로우; 12 스탠다드; 12 와이드; 12.5; 12.5 엑스트라 와이드; 12.5 미디엄; 12.5 내로우; 12.5 스탠다드; 12.5 와이드; 13; 13 엑스트라 와이드; 13 미디엄; 13 내로우; 13 스탠다드; 13 와이드; 13.5; 13.5 엑스트라 와이드; 13.5 미디엄; 13.5 내로우; 13.5 스탠다드; 13.5 와이드; 14; 14 엑스트라 와이드; 14 미디엄; 14 내로우; 14 스탠다드; 14 와이드; 14.5; 14.5 엑스트라 와이드; 14.5 미디엄; 14.5 내로우; 14.5 스탠다드; 14.5 와이드; 15; 15 엑스트라 와이드; 15 미디엄; 15 내로우; 15 스탠다드; 15 와이드; 15.5; 15.5 엑스트라 와이드; 15.5 미디엄; 15.5 내로우; 15.5 스탠다드; 15.5 와이드; 16; 16 엑스트라 와이드; 16 미디엄; 16 내로우; 16 스탠다드; 16 와이드; 5; 5 엑스트라 와이드; 5 미디엄; 5 내로우; 5 스탠다드; 5 와이드; 5.5; 5.5 엑스트라 와이드; 5.5 미디엄; 5.5 내로우; 5.5 스탠다드; 5.5 와이드; 6; 6 엑스트라 와이드; 6 미디엄; 6 내로우; 6 스탠다드; 6 와이드; 6.5; 6.5 엑스트라 와이드; 6.5 미디엄; 6.5 내로우; 6.5 스탠다드; 6.5 와이드; 7; 7 엑스트라 와이드; 7 미디엄; 7 내로우; 7 스탠다드; 7 와이드; 7.5; 7.5 엑스트라 와이드; 7.5 미디엄; 7.5 내로우; 7.5 스탠다드; 7.5 와이드; 8; 8 엑스트라 와이드; 8 미디엄; 8 내로우; 8 스탠다드; 8 와이드; 8.5; 8.5 엑스트라 와이드; 8.5 미디엄; 8.5 내로우; 8.5 스탠다드; 8.5 와이드; 9; 9 엑스트라 와이드; 9 미디엄; 9 내로우; 9 스탠다드; 9 와이드; 9.5; 9.5 엑스트라 와이드; 9.5 미디엄; 9.5 내로우; 9.5 스탠다드; 9.5 와이드; 기타
sv: Skostorlekar män Storbritannien: 10; 10 extra bred; 10 medium; 10 smal; 10 standard; 10 bred; 10,5; 10,5 extra bred; 10,5 medium; 10,5 smal; 10,5 standard; 10,5 bred; 11; 11 extra bred; 11 medium; 11 smal; 11 standard; 11 bred; 11,5; 11,5 extra bred; 11,5 medium; 11,5 smal; 11,5 standard; 11,5 bred; 12; 12 extra bred; 12 medium; 12 smal; 12 standard; 12 bred; 12,5; 12,5 extra bred; 12,5 medium; 12,5 smal; 12,5 standard; 12,5 bred; 13; 13 extra bred; 13 medium; 13 smal; 13 standard; 13 bred; 13,5; 13,5 extra bred; 13,5 medium; 13,5 smal; 13,5 standard; 13,5 bred; 14; 14 extra bred; 14 medium; 14 smal; 14 standard; 14 bred; 14,5; 14,5 extra bred; 14,5 medium; 14,5 smal; 14,5 standard; 14,5 bred; 15; 15 extra bred; 15 medium; 15 smal; 15 standard; 15 bred; 15,5; 15,5 extra bred; 15,5 medium; 15,5 smal; 15,5 standard; 15,5 bred; 16; 16 extra bred; 16 medium; 16 smal; 16 standard; 16 bred; 5; 5 extra bred; 5 medium; 5 smal; 5 standard; 5 bred; 5,5; 5,5 extra bred; 5,5 medium; 5,5 smal; 5,5 standard; 5,5 bred; 6; 6 extra bred; 6 medium; 6 smal; 6 standard; 6 bred; 6,5; 6,5 extra bred; 6,5 medium; 6,5 smal; 6,5 standard; 6,5 bred; 7; 7 extra bred; 7 medium; 7 smal; 7 standard; 7 bred; 7,5; 7,5 extra bred; 7,5 medium; 7,5 smal; 7,5 standard; 7,5 bred; 8; 8 extra bred; 8 medium; 8 smal; 8 standard; 8 bred; 8,5; 8,5 extra bred; 8,5 medium; 8,5 smal; 8,5 standard; 8,5 bred; 9; 9 extra bred; 9 medium; 9 smal; 9 standard; 9 bred; 9,5; 9,5 extra bred; 9,5 medium; 9,5 smal; 9,5 standard; 9,5 bred; Övrigt
hu: Angol férficipő-méret: 10; 10 Extra széles; 10 Közepes; 10 Keskeny; 10 Normál; 10 Széles; 10,5; 10,5 Extra széles; 10,5 Közepes; 10,5 Keskeny; 10,5 Normál; 10,5 Széles; 11; 11 Extra széles; 11 Közepes; 11 Keskeny; 11 Normál; 11 Széles; 11,5; 11,5 Extra széles; 11,5 Közepes; 11,5 Keskeny; 11,5 Normál; 11,5 Széles; 12; 12 Extra széles; 12 Közepes; 12 Keskeny; 12 Normál; 12 Széles; 12,5; 12,5 Extra széles; 12,5 Közepes; 12,5 Keskeny; 12,5 Normál; 12,5 Széles; 13; 13 Extra széles; 13 Közepes; 13 Keskeny; 13 Normál; 13 Széles; 13,5; 13,5 Extra széles; 13,5 Közepes; 13,5 Keskeny; 13,5 Normál; 13,5 Széles; 14; 14 Extra széles; 14 Közepes; 14 Keskeny; 14 Normál; 14 Széles; 14,5; 14,5 Extra széles; 14,5 Közepes; 14,5 Keskeny; 14,5 Normál; 14,5 Széles; 15; 15 Extra széles; 15 Közepes; 15 Keskeny; 15 Normál; 15 Széles; 15,5; 15,5 Extra széles; 15,5 Közepes; 15,5 Keskeny; 15,5 Normál; 15,5 Széles; 16; 16 Extra széles; 16 Közepes; 16 Keskeny; 16 Normál; 16 Széles; 5; 5 Extra széles; 5 Közepes; 5 Keskeny; 5 Normál; 5 Széles; 5,5; 5,5 Extra széles; 5,5 Közepes; 5,5 Keskeny; 5,5 Normál; 5,5 Széles; 6; 6 Extra széles; 6 Közepes; 6 Keskeny; 6 Normál; 6 Széles; 6,5; 6,5 Extra széles; 6,5 Közepes; 6,5 Keskeny; 6,5 Normál; 6,5 Széles; 7; 7 Extra széles; 7 Közepes; 7 Keskeny; 7 Normál; 7 Széles; 7,5; 7,5 Extra széles; 7,5 Közepes; 7,5 Keskeny; 7,5 Normál; 7,5 Széles; 8; 8 Extra széles; 8 Közepes; 8 Keskeny; 8 Normál; 8 Széles; 8,5; 8,5 Extra széles; 8,5 Közepes; 8,5 Keskeny; 8,5 Normál; 8,5 Széles; 9; 9 Extra széles; 9 Közepes; 9 Keskeny; 9 Normál; 9 Széles; 9,5; 9,5 Extra széles; 9,5 Közepes; 9,5 Keskeny; 9,5 Normál; 9,5 Széles; Egyéb
nb: Britisk størrelse for herresko: 10; 10 Ekstra bred; 10 Medium; 10 Smal; 10 Standard; 10 Bred; 10,5; 10,5 Ekstra bred; 10,5 Medium; 10,5 Smal; 10,5 Standard; 10,5 Bred; 11; 11 Ekstra bred; 11 Medium; 11 Smal; 11 Standard; 11 Bred; 11,5; 11,5 Ekstra bred; 11,5 Medium; 11,5 Smal; 11,5 Standard; 11,5 Bred; 12; 12 Ekstra bred; 12 Medium; 12 Smal; 12 Standard; 12 Bred; 12,5; 12,5 Ekstra bred; 12,5 Medium; 12,5 Smal; 12,5 Standard; 12,5 Bred; 13; 13 Ekstra bred; 13 Medium; 13 Smal; 13 Standard; 13 Bred; 13,5; 13,5 Ekstra bred; 13,5 Medium; 13,5 Smal; 13,5 Standard; 13,5 Bred; 14; 14 ekstra bred; 14 medium; 14 smal; 14 standard; 14 bred; 14,5; 14,5 Ekstra bred; 14,5 Medium; 14,5 Smal; 14,5 Standard; 14,5 Bred; 15; 15 ekstra bred; 15 medium; 15 smal; 15 standard; 15 bred; 15,5; 15,5 ekstra bred; 15,5 medium; 15,5 smal; 15,5 standard; 15,5 bred; 16; 16 ekstra bred; 16 medium; 16 smal; 16 standard; 16 bred; 5; 5 ekstra bred; 5 medium; 5 smal; 5 standard; 5 bred; 5,5; 5,5 ekstra bred; 5,5 medium; 5,5 smal; 5,5 standard; 5,5 bred; 6; 6 ekstra bred; 6 medium; 6 smal; 6 standard; 6 bred; 6,5; 6,5 ekstra bred; 6,5 medium; 6,5 smal; 6,5 standard; 6,5 bred; 7; 7 ekstra bred; 7 medium; 7 smal; 7 standard; 7 bred; 7,5; 7,5 ekstra bred; 7,5 medium; 7,5 smal; 7,5 standard; 7,5 bred; 8; 8 ekstra bred; 8 medium; 8 smal; 8 standard; 8 bred; 8,5; 8,5 ekstra bred; 8,5 medium; 8,5 smal; 8,5 standard; 8,5 bred; 9; 9 ekstra bred; 9 medium; 9 smal; 9 standard; 9 bred; 9,5; 9,5 ekstra bred; 9,5 medium; 9,5 smal; 9,5 standard; 9,5 bred; Annet
nl: UK schoenmaat mannen: 10; 10 Extra breed; 10 Normaal; 10 Smal; 10 Standaard; 10 Breed; 10.5; 10.5 Extra breed; 10.5 Normaal; 10.5 Smal; 10.5 Standaard; 10.5 Breed; 11; 11 Extra breed; 11 Normaal; 11 Smal; 11 Standaard; 11 Breed; 11.5; 11.5 Extra breed; 11.5 Normaal; 11.5 Smal; 11.5 Standaard; 11.5 Breed; 12; 12 Extra breed; 12 Normaal; 12 Smal; 12 Standaard; 12 Breed; 12.5; 12.5 Extra breed; 12.5 Normaal; 12.5 Smal; 12.5 Standaard; 12.5 Breed; 13; 13 Extra breed; 13 Normaal; 13 Smal; 13 Standaard; 13 Breed; 13.5; 13.5 Extra breed; 13.5 Normaal; 13.5 Smal; 13.5 Standaard; 13.5 Breed; 14; 14 Extra breed; 14 Medium; 14 Smal; 14 Standaard; 14 Breed; 14.5; 14.5 Extra breed; 14.5 Normaal; 14.5 Smal; 14.5 Standaard; 14.5 Breed; 15; 15 Extra breed; 15 Medium; 15 Smal; 15 Standaard; 15 Breed; 15,5; 15,5 Extra breed; 15,5 Medium; 15,5 Smal; 15,5 Standaard; 15,5 Breed; 16; 16 Extra breed; 16 Medium; 16 Smal; 16 Standaard; 16 Breed; 5; 5 Extra breed; 5 Medium; 5 Smal; 5 Standaard; 5 Breed; 5,5; 5,5 Extra breed; 5,5 Medium; 5,5 Smal; 5,5 Standaard; 5,5 Breed; 6; 6 Extra breed; 6 Medium; 6 Smal; 6 Standaard; 6 Breed; 6,5; 6,5 Extra breed; 6,5 Medium; 6,5 Smal; 6,5 Standaard; 6,5 Breed; 7; 7 Extra breed; 7 Medium; 7 Smal; 7 Standaard; 7 Breed; 7,5; 7,5 Extra breed; 7,5 Medium; 7,5 Smal; 7,5 Standaard; 7,5 Breed; 8; 8 Extra breed; 8 Medium; 8 Smal; 8 Standaard; 8 Breed; 8,5; 8,5 Extra breed; 8,5 Medium; 8,5 Smal; 8,5 Standaard; 8,5 Breed; 9; 9 Extra breed; 9 Medium; 9 Smal; 9 Standaard; 9 Breed; 9,5; 9,5 Extra breed; 9,5 Medium; 9,5 Smal; 9,5 Standaard; 9,5 Breed; Anders
lt-LT: JK vyriškų batų dydis: 10; 10 itin plati; 10 vidutinė; 10 siaura; 10 standartinė; 10 plati; 10,5; 10,5 itin plati; 10,5 vidutinė; 10,5 siaura; 10,5 standartinė; 10,5 plati; 11; 11 itin plati; 11 vidutinė; 11 siaura; 11 standartinė; 11 plati; 11,5; 11,5 itin plati; 11,5 vidutinė; 11,5 siaura; 11,5 standartinė; 11,5 plati; 12; 12 itin plati; 12 vidutinė; 12 siaura; 12 standartinė; 12 plati; 12,5; 12,5 itin plati; 12,5 vidutinė; 12,5 siaura; 12,5 standartinė; 12,5 plati; 13; 13 itin plati; 13 vidutinė; 13 siaura; 13 standartinė; 13 plati; 13,5; 13,5 itin plati; 13,5 vidutinė; 13,5 siaura; 13,5 standartinė; 13,5 plati; 14; 14 itin plati; 14 vidutinė; 14 siaura; 14 standartinė; 14 plati; 14,5; 14,5 itin plati; 14,5 vidutinė; 14,5 siaura; 14,5 standartinė; 14,5 plati; 15; 15 itin plati; 15 vidutinė; 15 siaura; 15 standartinė; 15 plati; 15,5; 15,5 itin plati; 15,5 vidutinė; 15,5 siaura; 15,5 standartinė; 15,5 plati; 16; 16 itin plati; 16 vidutinė; 16 siaura; 16 standartinė; 16 plati; 5; 5 itin plati; 5 vidutinė; 5 siaura; 5 standartinė; 5 plati; 5,5; 5,5 itin plati; 5,5 vidutinė; 5,5 siaura; 5,5 standartinė; 5,5 plati; 6; 6 itin plati; 6 vidutinė; 6 siaura; 6 standartinė; 6 plati; 6,5; 6,5 itin plati; 6,5 vidutinė; 6,5 siaura; 6,5 standartinė; 6,5 plati; 7; 7 itin platus; 7 vidutinis; 7 siauras; 7 standartinis; 7 platus; 7,5; 7,5 itin plati; 7,5 vidutinė; 7,5 siauras; 7,5 standartinis; 7,5 platus; 8; 8 itin platus; 8 vidutinis; 8 siauras; 8 standartinis; 8 platus; 8,5; 8,5 itin platus; 8,5 vidutinis; 8,5 siauras; 8,5 standartinis; 8,5 platus; 9; 9 itin platus; 9 vidutinis; 9 siauras; 9 standartinis; 9 platus; 9,5; 9,5 itin platus; 9,5 vidutinis; 9,5 siauras; 9,5 standartinis; 9,5 platus; Kita
ru: Размер мужской обуви UK: 10; 10 очень широкий; 10 средний; 10 узкий; 10 стандартный; 10 широкий; 10,5; 10,5 очень широкий; 10,5 средний; 10,5 узкий; 10,5 стандартный; 10,5 широкий; 11; 11 очень широкий; 11 средний; 11 узкий; 11 стандартный; 11 широкий; 11,5; 11,5 очень широкий; 11,5 средний; 11,5 узкий; 11,5 стандартный; 11,5 широкий; 12; 12 очень широкий; 12 средний; 12 узкий; 12 стандартный; 12 широкий; 12,5; 12,5 очень широкий; 12,5 средний; 12,5 узкий; 12,5 стандартный; 12,5 широкий; 13; 13 очень широкий; 13 средний; 13 узкий; 13 стандартный; 13 широкий; 13,5; 13,5 очень широкий; 13,5 средний; 13,5 узкий; 13,5 стандартный; 13,5 широкий; 14; 14, очень широкий; 14, средний; 14, узкий; 14, стандартный; 14, широкий; 14,5; 14,5 очень широкий; 14,5 средний; 14,5 узкий; 14,5 стандартный; 14,5 широкий; 15; 15, очень широкий; 15, средний; 15, узкий; 15, стандартный; 15, широкий; 15,5; 15,5, очень широкий; 15,5, средний; 15,5, узкий; 15,5, стандартный; 15,5, широкий; 16; 16, очень широкий; 16, средний; 16, узкий; 16, стандартный; 16, широкий; 5; 5, очень широкий; 5, средний; 5, узкий; 5, стандартный; 5, широкий; 5,5; 5,5, очень широкий; 5,5, средний; 5,5, узкий; 5,5, стандартный; 5,5, широкий; 6; 6, очень широкий; 6, средний; 6, узкий; 6, стандартный; 6, широкий; 6,5; 6,5, очень широкий; 6,5, средний; 6,5, узкий; 6,5, стандартный; 6,5, широкий; 7; 7, очень широкий; 7, средний; 7, узкий; 7, стандартный; 7, широкий; 7,5; 7,5, очень широкий; 7,5, средний; 7,5, узкий; 7,5, стандартный; 7,5, широкий; 8; 8, очень широкий; 8, средний; 8, узкий; 8, стандартный; 8, широкий; 8,5; 8,5, очень широкий; 8,5, средний; 8,5, узкий; 8,5, стандартный; 8,5, широкий; 9; 9, очень широкий; 9, средний; 9, узкий; 9, стандартный; 9, широкий; 9,5; 9,5, очень широкий; 9,5, средний; 9,5, узкий; 9,5, стандартный; 9,5, широкий; Другое
cs: Britská velikost pánské obuvi: 10; 10 extra široké; 10 střední; 10 úzké; 10 standardní; 10 široké; 10,5; 10,5 extra široké; 10,5 střední; 10,5 úzké; 10,5 standardní; 10,5 široké; 11; 11 extra široké; 11 střední; 11 úzké; 11 standardní; 11 široké; 11,5; 11,5 extra široké; 11,5 střední; 11,5 úzké; 11,5 standardní; 11,5 široké; 12; 12 extra široké; 12 střední; 12 úzké; 12 standardní; 12 široké; 12,5; 12,5 extra široké; 12,5 střední; 12,5 úzké; 12,5 standardní; 12,5 široké; 13; 13 extra široké; 13 střední; 13 úzké; 13 standardní; 13 široké; 13,5; 13,5 extra široké; 13,5 střední; 13,5 úzké; 13,5 standardní; 13,5 široké; 14; 14 extra široké; 14 střední; 14 úzké; 14 standardní; 14 široké; 14,5; 14,5 extra široké; 14,5 střední; 14,5 úzké; 14,5 standardní; 14,5 široké; 15; 15 extra široké; 15 střední; 15 úzké; 15 standardní; 15 široké; 15,5; 15,5 extra široké; 15,5 střední; 15,5 úzké; 15,5 standardní; 15,5 široké; 16; 16 extra široké; 16 střední; 16 úzké; 16 standardní; 16 široké; 5; 5 extra široké; 5 střední; 5 úzké; 5 standardní; 5 široké; 5,5; 5,5 extra široké; 5,5 střední; 5,5 úzké; 5,5 standardní; 5,5 široké; 6; 6 extra široké; 6 střední; 6 úzké; 6 standardní; 6 široké; 6,5; 6,5 extra široké; 6,5 střední; 6,5 úzké; 6,5 standardní; 6,5 široké; 7; 7 extra široké; 7 střední; 7 úzké; 7 standardní; 7 široké; 7,5; 7,5 extra široké; 7,5 střední; 7,5 úzké; 7,5 standardní; 7,5 široké; 8; 8 extra široké; 8 střední; 8 úzké; 8 standardní; 8 široké; 8,5; 8,5 extra široké; 8,5 střední; 8,5 úzké; 8,5 standardní; 8,5 široké; 9; 9 extra široké; 9 střední; 9 úzké; 9 standardní; 9 široké; 9,5; 9,5 extra široké; 9,5 střední; 9,5 úzké; 9,5 standardní; 9,5 široké; Ostatní
sl-SI: Britanska velikost moških čevljev: 10; 10 zelo široko; 10 srednje; 10 ozko; 10 standardno; 10 široko; 10,5; 10,5 zelo široko; 10,5 srednje; 10,5 ozko; 10,5 standardno; 10,5 široko; 11; 11 zelo široko; 11 srednje; 11 ozko; 11 standardno; 11 široko; 11,5; 11,5 zelo široko; 11,5 srednje; 11,5 ozko; 11,5 standardno; 11,5 široko; 12; 12 zelo široko; 12 srednje; 12 ozko; 12 standardno; 12 široko; 12,5; 12,5 zelo široko; 12,5 srednje; 12,5 ozko; 12,5 standardno; 12,5 široko; 13; 13 zelo široko; 13 srednje; 13 ozko; 13 standardno; 13 široko; 13,5; 13,5 zelo široko; 13,5 srednje; 13,5 ozko; 13,5 standardno; 13,5 široko; 14; 14 zelo široko; 14 srednje; 14 ozko; 14 standardno; 14 široko; 14,5; 14,5 zelo široko; 14,5 srednje; 14,5 ozko; 14,5 standardno; 14,5 široko; 15; 15 zelo široko; 15 srednje; 15 ozko; 15 standardno; 15 široko; 15,5; 15,5 zelo široko; 15,5 srednje; 15,5 ozko; 15,5 standardno; 15,5 široko; 16; 16 zelo široko; 16 srednje; 16 ozko; 16 standardno; 16 široko; 5; 5 zelo široko; 5 srednje; 5 ozko; 5 standardno; 5 široko; 5,5; 5,5 zelo široko; 5,5 srednje; 5,5 ozko; 5,5 standardno; 5,5 široko; 6; 6 zelo široko; 6 srednje; 6 ozko; 6 standardno; 6 široko; 6,5; 6,5 zelo široko; 6,5 srednje; 6,5 ozko; 6,5 standardno; 6,5 široko; 7; 7 zelo široki; 7 srednji; 7 ozki; 7 standardni; 7 široki; 7,5; 7,5 zelo široko; 7,5 srednje; 7,5 ozki; 7,5 standardni; 7,5 široki; 8; 8 zelo široki; 8 srednji; 8 ozki; 8 standardni; 8 široki; 8,5; 8,5 zelo široki; 8,5 srednji; 8,5 ozki; 8,5 standardni; 8,5 široki; 9; 9 zelo široki; 9 srednji; 9 ozki; 9 standardni; 9 široki; 9,5; 9,5 zelo široki; 9,5 srednji; 9,5 ozki; 9,5 standardni; 9,5 široki; Drugo
th: ขนาดรองเท้าผู้ชายแบบอังกฤษ: 10; 10 กว้างพิเศษ; 10 ปานกลาง; 10 แคบ; 10 มาตรฐาน; 10 กว้าง; 10.5; 10.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 10.5 ปานกลาง; 10.5 แคบ; 10.5 มาตรฐาน; 10.5 กว้าง; 11; 11 กว้างพิเศษ; 11 ปานกลาง; 11 แคบ; 11 มาตรฐาน; 11 กว้าง; 11.5; 11.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 11.5 ปานกลาง; 11.5 แคบ; 11.5 มาตรฐาน; 11.5 กว้าง; 12; 12 กว้างพิเศษ; 12 ปานกลาง; 12 แคบ; 12 มาตรฐาน; 12 กว้าง; 12.5; 12.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 12.5 ปานกลาง; 12.5 แคบ; 12.5 มาตรฐาน; 12.5 กว้าง; 13; 13 กว้างพิเศษ; 13 ปานกลาง; 13 แคบ; 13 มาตรฐาน; 13 กว้าง; 13.5; 13.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 13.5 ปานกลาง; 13.5 แคบ; 13.5 มาตรฐาน; 13.5 กว้าง; 14; 14 กว้างพิเศษ; 14 ปานกลาง; 14 แคบ; 14 มาตรฐาน; 14 กว้าง; 14.5; 14.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 14.5 ปานกลาง; 14.5 แคบ; 14.5 มาตรฐาน; 14.5 กว้าง; 15; 15 กว้างพิเศษ; 15 ปานกลาง; 15 แคบ; 15 มาตรฐาน; 15 กว้าง; 15.5; 15.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 15.5 ปานกลาง; 15.5 แคบ; 15.5 มาตรฐาน; 15.5 กว้าง; 16; 16 กว้างพิเศษ; 16 ปานกลาง; 16 แคบ; 16 มาตรฐาน; 16 กว้าง; 5; 5 กว้างพิเศษ; 5 ปานกลาง; 5 แคบ; 5 มาตรฐาน; 5 กว้าง; 5.5; 5.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 5.5 ปานกลาง; 5.5 แคบ; 5.5 มาตรฐาน; 5.5 กว้าง; 6; 6 กว้างพิเศษ; 6 ปานกลาง; 6 แคบ; 6 มาตรฐาน; 6 กว้าง; 6.5; 6.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 6.5 ปานกลาง; 6.5 แคบ; 6.5 มาตรฐาน; 6.5 กว้าง; 7; 7 กว้างพิเศษ; 7 ปานกลาง; 7 แคบ; 7 มาตรฐาน; 7 กว้าง; 7.5; 7.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 7.5 ปานกลาง; 7.5 แคบ; 7.5 มาตรฐาน; 7.5 กว้าง; 8; 8 กว้างพิเศษ; 8 ปานกลาง; 8 แคบ; 8 มาตรฐาน; 8 กว้าง; 8.5; 8.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 8.5 ปานกลาง; 8.5 แคบ; 8.5 มาตรฐาน; 8.5 กว้าง; 9; 9 กว้างพิเศษ; 9 ปานกลาง; 9 แคบ; 9 มาตรฐาน; 9 กว้าง; 9.5; 9.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 9.5 ปานกลาง; 9.5 แคบ; 9.5 มาตรฐาน; 9.5 กว้าง; อื่นๆ
en: UK men's shoe size: 10; 10 Extra Wide; 10 Medium; 10 Narrow; 10 Standard; 10 Wide; 10.5; 10.5 Extra Wide; 10.5 Medium; 10.5 Narrow; 10.5 Standard; 10.5 Wide; 11; 11 Extra Wide; 11 Medium; 11 Narrow; 11 Standard; 11 Wide; 11.5; 11.5 Extra Wide; 11.5 Medium; 11.5 Narrow; 11.5 Standard; 11.5 Wide; 12; 12 Extra Wide; 12 Medium; 12 Narrow; 12 Standard; 12 Wide; 12.5; 12.5 Extra Wide; 12.5 Medium; 12.5 Narrow; 12.5 Standard; 12.5 Wide; 13; 13 Extra Wide; 13 Medium; 13 Narrow; 13 Standard; 13 Wide; 13.5; 13.5 Extra Wide; 13.5 Medium; 13.5 Narrow; 13.5 Standard; 13.5 Wide; 14; 14 Extra Wide; 14 Medium; 14 Narrow; 14 Standard; 14 Wide; 14.5; 14.5 Extra Wide; 14.5 Medium; 14.5 Narrow; 14.5 Standard; 14.5 Wide; 15; 15 Extra Wide; 15 Medium; 15 Narrow; 15 Standard; 15 Wide; 15.5; 15.5 Extra Wide; 15.5 Medium; 15.5 Narrow; 15.5 Standard; 15.5 Wide; 16; 16 Extra Wide; 16 Medium; 16 Narrow; 16 Standard; 16 Wide; 5; 5 Extra Wide; 5 Medium; 5 Narrow; 5 Standard; 5 Wide; 5.5; 5.5 Extra Wide; 5.5 Medium; 5.5 Narrow; 5.5 Standard; 5.5 Wide; 6; 6 Extra Wide; 6 Medium; 6 Narrow; 6 Standard; 6 Wide; 6.5; 6.5 Extra Wide; 6.5 Medium; 6.5 Narrow; 6.5 Standard; 6.5 Wide; 7; 7 Extra Wide; 7 Medium; 7 Narrow; 7 Standard; 7 Wide; 7.5; 7.5 Extra Wide; 7.5 Medium; 7.5 Narrow; 7.5 Standard; 7.5 Wide; 8; 8 Extra Wide; 8 Medium; 8 Narrow; 8 Standard; 8 Wide; 8.5; 8.5 Extra Wide; 8.5 Medium; 8.5 Narrow; 8.5 Standard; 8.5 Wide; 9; 9 Extra Wide; 9 Medium; 9 Narrow; 9 Standard; 9 Wide; 9.5; 9.5 Extra Wide; 9.5 Medium; 9.5 Narrow; 9.5 Standard; 9.5 Wide; Other